New Jersey, session 222, A1095.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Prior to the execution of the agreement of sale of a parcel of real property constructed using a long-term tax exemption pursuant to the Long Term Tax Exemption Law, P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-1 et seq.) and subject to the attorney review which, as applicable, may be required to precede the final execution of the contract for sale of real estate, the seller of the parcel of real property shall provide to a prospective purchaser of such a parcel of real property who is one or more individuals, a detailed, written document explaining the payment in lieu of property tax required to be paid by the purchaser of such a property pursuant to an agreement between the municipality and the urban renewal entity that developed the real property.  The document shall inform the prospective purchaser about how the payment in lieu of property tax shall be calculated, the length of the term of the agreement requiring the payment in lieu of property tax to be made, and whether making a payment in lieu of property taxes on the parcel of real property shall affect the prospective purchasers ability to qualify for assistance from State property tax relief programs. The prospective purchaser shall review the document required in this section and shall sign and date the document, which shall be returned to the seller of the parcel of real property after the conclusion of an attorney review, if applicable.  If there is no attorney review, the signed document shall be returned to the seller along with the executed contract of sale.  The prospective purchaser shall retain a signed and dated copy of the document. The information required to be provided in the document shall be provided by the municipality to the seller, at the expense of the seller, from the agreement entered into between the municipality and the urban renewal entity.  If the prospective sale of the parcel of real property is between a seller who is not the urban renewal entity and a prospective purchaser, the information required to be provided in the document shall also be provided by the municipality to the seller, at the expense of the seller, from the agreement entered into between the municipality and the urban renewal entity. As used in this section, seller shall mean an urban renewal entity, if the property is newly constructed, or the person who owns the property. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.